Maine, session 132, LD1193.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §81, as amended by PL 1977, c. 674, §1, is further amended by
amending the section headnote to read:
§81. Office and duties; vacancy; salary; expenses; fees; election convention
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §81, as amended by PL 1977, c. 674, §1, is further amended by
enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
A convention that is held by the Legislature to elect the Secretary of State pursuant to
the Constitution of Maine, Article V, Part Second, Section 1 must be open to the public and
the vote of each voting Senator and Representative must be recorded and made available
for public inspection.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §121, as amended by PL 2005, c. 683, Pt. C, §1, is further amended
by amending the section headnote to read:
§121. Office; bond; salary; deputy; fees; election convention
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §121, as amended by PL 2005, c. 683, Pt. C, §1, is further amended
by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
A convention that is held by the Legislature to elect the Treasurer of State pursuant to
the Constitution of Maine, Article V, Part Third, Section 1 must be open to the public and
the vote of each voting Senator and Representative must be recorded and made available
for public inspection.
Sec. 5. 5 MRSA §191-A, as corrected by RR 2023, c. 2, Pt. B, §26, is amended to
read:
§191-A. Transition Election convention; transition period
A convention that is held by the Legislature to elect the Attorney General pursuant to
the Constitution of Maine, Article IX, Section 11 must be open to the public and the vote
of each voting Senator and Representative must be recorded and made available for public
inspection.
In order to provide for an orderly transition following the biennial election of the
Attorney General, the Attorney General-elect may not take the oath of office or otherwise
qualify for the office for a period of no less than 30 days following that election.
Sec. 6. 5 MRSA §241, as amended by PL 2015, c. 44, §3, is further amended by
amending the section headnote to read:
§241. State Auditor; election convention; salary
Sec. 7. 5 MRSA §241, first ¶, as amended by PL 2013, c. 16, §1, is further amended
to read:
The State Auditor is the head of the Office of the State Auditor. The State Auditor must
be a certified public accountant or a college graduate with not less than 6 years of
experience as a professional accountant or auditor, including not less than 5 years of
auditing experience, of which not less than 4 years must have been in a supervisory
capacity. The State Auditor must be elected by the Legislature by a joint ballot of the
Senators and Representatives in convention and. The convention must be open to the public
Page 1 - 132LR0582(01)

411 and the vote of each voting Senator and Representative must be recorded and made
422 available for public inspection. The State Auditor holds office for a term of 4 years or until
433 a successor is elected and qualified. The State Auditor shall exercise such the powers and
444 perform such the duties as are set forth in this chapter. In case the office of State Auditor
455 becomes vacant during a period when the Legislature is not in session, the appointment of
466 a person to fill such the vacancy must be made immediately by the President of the Senate
477 or, if that office is vacant, by the Speaker of the House, and the person appointed holds that
488 office until such time as the Legislature meets in regular or special session, and either
499 confirm confirms the appointment of the person or chooses another person to fill the office
1500 during the unexpired term.